North Carolina, session 2025, HB262.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Department
of Transportation shall designate the overpass on Interstate 74 that crosses South Main Street in
the City of Laurinburg in Scotland County in honor of Chief of Police Robert Lee Malloy.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H262-v-1*